02_Morphology/chv.twol
Alphabet
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ
  А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ 
 
%{A%}:а %{A%}:е
%{Ă%}:ӑ %{Ă%}:ӗ %{Ă%}:0
%{м%}:м %{м%}:0

%{ъ%}
%>:0 

;

Sets

BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю %{ъ%};

FrontVow = ӗ э и ӳ е ; 

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ ; 

ArchiCns = %{м%} ;

Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:а <=> BackVow: [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {Ă}"
%{Ă%}:ӑ <=> BackVow: [ ArchiCns: | Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;
        except
                                  %{м%}: %>: _ н ;
			          [а|e ] %>: _ н ; 

"Non surface {Ă} in plural genitive"       ! constraining %{Ă%} to be 0 when following %{м%}
%{Ă%}:0 <=> %{м%}: %>: _ н ;

"Non surface {Ă} after stem vowels"        ! constraining  %{Ă%} to be 0 when following а or е
%{Ă%}:0 <=> [а|е]  %>: _ н ;  

"Non surface {м} in plural genitive"      ! constraining %{м%} to be 0 
%{м%}:0 <=>  с е _  %> %{Ă%}: н ; 

!@  лайк > се{м} > п{A}
!@  лайк 0 се м  0 п е 

!@  лайк > се{м} > {Ă} н
!@  лайк 0 се 0  0  0  н
